Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-112
Course of study, defined.

Course of study means a program of instruction necessary to obtain a credential meeting the requirements set out for each profession in the appropriate practice act and rules and regulations and includes a college, a professional school, a vocational school, hours of training, or a program of instruction with a similar designation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 12.